Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-216
School lands; acquisition for airfields and monitor stations.

The United States of America, or any county, city or village of the State of Nebraska may acquire such educational lands necessary for public use for the development of radio monitor stations, aviation fields, and fields for aerial traffic.

Laws 1931, c. 118, § 1, p. 345;

Laws 1935, c. 164, § 1, p. 611;

Laws 1941, c. 145, § 1, p. 576;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-211;

Laws 1943, c. 160, § 1, p. 573;

R.S.1943, § 72-216.